District of Columbia statutes.
7-1612

Designation of the Effi Slaughter Barry HIV/AIDS Initiative.

The East of the River HIV/AIDS Capacity Building Initiative administered by the Department of Health shall be known as the Effi Slaughter Barry HIV/AIDS Initiative (“initiative”).

History

Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-117, § 3, 55 DCR 1282